California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
In addition to the provisions in Section 3695 relative to objections to sales, the state or city or any taxing agency or revenue district may file with the county tax collector written objection to the sale of, along with an application to purchase in accordance with Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 3771), any property that is or may be needed for public use. The written objection shall specify the description of the property needed, whether the fee or an easement is required, and the public purpose to which the property is intended to be devoted.

The objection and application shall be filed with the tax collector before the date of the first publication of the notice of intended sale pursuant to Sections 3702 and 3703. If the state, a city, taxing agency, or revenue district files an objection and application in compliance with this section, the tax collector may not proceed with the sale of the subject property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 606, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3695.5.

In addition to the provisions of Sections 3695 and 3695.4 relative to objections to sales, any nonprofit organization may file with the county tax collector written objection to the sale for taxes of, and a written application to purchase in accordance with Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 3771), any residential or vacant real property that the nonprofit organization states in writing that it will:

(a) In the case of residential real property, rehabilitate and sell or rent to, or otherwise use the property to serve, low-income persons.

(b) In the case of vacant real property, construct residential dwellings on the property and sell or rent the property to low-income persons, otherwise use the property to serve low-income persons, or dedicate the vacant property to public use, including those uses referred to in subdivision (a).

The objection and application shall be filed with the tax collector before the date of the first publication or posting of the notice of intended sale pursuant to Sections 3702 and 3703. If the nonprofit organization files an objection and application in compliance with this section and with any conditions of sale established pursuant to Section 3795.5, the tax collector may not proceed with the sale of the property.

The terms “nonprofit organization,” “low-income persons” and “rehabilitation” shall have the same meaning in this section as in Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 3771).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 606, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3698.

To make any sale under this chapter, the tax collector shall transmit a notice to the board of supervisors, stating:

(a) His intention to make a sale under this chapter, and the type of sale;

(b) A description of the property to be sold;

(c) The minimum price at which it is proposed to sell the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 529.)
-------------------------------------------

3698.5.

(a) Except as provided in Section 3698.7, the minimum price at which property may be offered for sale pursuant to this chapter shall be an amount not less than the total amount necessary to redeem, plus costs and the outstanding balance of any property tax postponement loan. For purposes of this subdivision:

(1) The “total amount necessary to redeem” is the sum of the following:

(A) The amount of defaulted taxes.

(B) Delinquent penalties and costs.

(C) Redemption penalties.

(D) A redemption fee.

(2) “Costs” are those amounts described in subdivision (c) of Section 3704.7, subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 4112, Sections 4672, 4672.1, 4672.2, 4673, and subdivision (b) of Section 4673.1.

(3) The “outstanding balance of any property tax postponement loan” is the sum of the following:

(A) The tax payments made by the Controller’s office on behalf of the claimant in the Property Tax Postponement Program.

(B) Accrued interest pursuant to Section 16183 of the Government Code, subject to Sections 20644 and 20644.5.

(C) Other associated fees and penalties as deemed appropriate by law.

(D) Less any payments already made on the property tax postponement loan.

(b) This section shall not apply to property or interests that qualify for sale in accordance with the provisions of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 3692.

(c) If property or property interests have been offered for sale at least once and the tax collector has received no acceptable bids for that property or those interests at the minimum price determined pursuant to subdivision (a), the tax collector may, in his or her discretion and with the approval of the board of
 supervisors, offer that same property or those interests at the same or next scheduled sale at a minimum price that the tax collector deems appropriate in light of the most current assessed valuation of that property or those interests, or any unique circumstance with respect to that property or those interests.

(d) The current owner of tax-defaulted property subject to sale under this chapter shall not purchase that property, directly or indirectly, at a price below the minimum price determined pursuant to subdivision (a). No deed shall be transferred to the purchaser if the property is
 purchased, directly or indirectly, by the current owner for lower than the minimum price determined pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 601, Sec. 1.   (SB 812)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3698.7.

(a) With respect to property for which a property tax welfare exemption has been granted and that has become tax defaulted, the minimum price at which the property may be offered for sale pursuant to this chapter shall be the higher of the following:

(1) Fifty percent of the fair market value of the property. For the purposes of this paragraph, “fair market value” means the amount as defined in Section 110 as determined pursuant to an appraisal of the property by the county assessor within one year immediately preceding the date of the public auction. From the proceeds of the sale, there shall be distributed to the county general fund an amount to reimburse the county for the cost of appraising the property. The value of
 the property as determined by the assessor pursuant to an appraisal shall be conclusively presumed to be the fair market value of the property for the purpose of determining the minimum price at which the property may be offered for sale.

(2) The total amount necessary to redeem, plus costs and the outstanding balance of any property tax postponement loan. For purposes of this paragraph:

(A) The “total amount necessary to redeem” is the sum of the following:

(i) The amount of defaulted taxes.

(ii) Delinquent penalties and costs.

(iii) Redemption penalties.

(iv) A redemption fee.

(B) “Costs” are those amounts described in subdivision (c) of Section 3704.7, subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 4112, Sections 4672, 4672.1, 4672.2, and 4673, and subdivision (b) of Section 4673.1.

(3) The “outstanding balance of any property tax postponement loan” is the sum of the following:

(A) The tax payments made by the State Controller’s office on behalf of the claimant in the Property Tax Postponement Program.

(B) Accrued interest pursuant to Section 16183 of the Government Code, subject to Sections 20644 and 20644.5.

(C) Other associated fees and penalties as deemed appropriate by law.

(D) Less any payments already made
 on the property tax postponement loan.

(b) This section shall not apply to property or interests that qualify for sale in accordance with the provisions of subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 3692.

(c) Where property or property interests have been offered for sale at least once and no acceptable bids therefor have been received, at the minimum price determined pursuant to subdivision (a), the tax collector may, in his or her discretion and with the approval of the board of supervisors, offer that same property or those interests at the same or next scheduled sale at a minimum price that the tax collector deems appropriate in light of the most current assessed valuation of that property or those interests, or any unique circumstance with respect to that property or those interests.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 703, Sec. 23.   (AB 2231)   Effective September 28, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3698.8.

The tax collector, upon the recommendation of county counsel, may remove a parcel from the tax sale if it is deemed the removal is in the best interest of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 352, Sec. 5.   (SB 948)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3699.

On receipt of the notice described in Section 3698, the board of supervisors shall by resolution either approve or disapprove the proposed sale and shall transmit a certified copy of the resolution to the tax collector within five days after its action. Failure to adopt or to transmit the resolution within the prescribed times shall not affect the validity of a sale approved by a board of supervisors.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4839.2 by Stats. 2009, Ch. 17, Sec. 7.   (SB 823)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

3700.

Upon providing notice to the board of supervisors as required by Section 3698, the tax collector shall forward one copy to the clerk or secretary of the governing board of each taxing agency, other than the county, having the right to levy taxes or assessments on the property and may forward one copy to each nonprofit organization that has submitted, within one year prior to the next scheduled tax sale or prior to July 31 of the current calendar year, a written request to the tax collector for notification. The copy or copies shall be mailed, sent electronically, or delivered at least 30 days before the first publication or posting of the notice of intended sale. However, where the tax collector has on file a consent from each
 taxing agency, the tax collector may proceed to publish or post the notice of sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 451, Sec. 7.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

3700.5.

Not less than 45 days nor more than 120 days before the proposed sale, the tax collector shall send notice of the proposed sale to the Controller. The notice shall state the date, time, and place of the proposed sale. The tax collector shall notify the Controller of any postponement of the tax sale and the date, time, and place of the sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 497, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

3701.

(a) Not less than 45 days nor more than 120 days before the proposed sale, the tax collector shall send notice of the proposed sale by certified mail with return receipt requested to the last known mailing address, if available, of parties of interest, as defined in Section 4675. The notice shall state the date, time, and place of the proposed sale, the amount required to redeem the property, and the fact that the property may be redeemed up to the close of business on the last business day prior to the date of the sale, and information regarding the rights of parties of interest to claim excess proceeds, as defined in Section 4674, if the property is sold and excess proceeds result
 from that sale.

 (b) The tax collector shall make a reasonable effort to obtain the name and last known mailing address of parties of interest.

 (c) The validity of any sale under this chapter shall not be affected if the tax collector’s reasonable effort fails to disclose the name and last known mailing address of parties of interest or if a party of interest does not receive the mailed notice.

(d) If the property subject to the notice required by this section is the subject of a bankruptcy proceeding, the notice shall constitute a “notice of tax deficiency” pursuant to Section 362(b)(9)(B) of Title 11 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 119, Sec. 4.   (SB 1506)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3702.

(a) The tax collector shall publish the notice of intended sale once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county seat and in a newspaper of general circulation published in the public notice district in which the property is situated. If the same newspaper of general circulation is published in both the county seat and in the public notice district, or if the publication of the notice of sale is made in a newspaper which is determined pursuant to Section 3381 as most likely to afford adequate notice of the sale, a publication in that
 newspaper shall satisfy the requirements for publication set forth in this section. If there is no newspaper published in the county seat or in the public notice district, then publication in the location in which there is no newspaper may be made by posting notice in three public places in the county seat. The publication shall be started not less than 21 days prior to the date of the sale.

(b) For the purposes of this section, publication of notice in a public notice district is governed by Chapter 1.1 (commencing with Section 6080) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 703, Sec. 21.   (AB 2881)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3703.

If in the judgment of the board of supervisors any property to be sold under this chapter will bring at auction less than the cost of publication in a newspaper, the publication of the notice of intended sale may be made in the same manner as if there were no newspaper published in the county seat or in the public notice district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 703, Sec. 22.   (AB 2881)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3704.

The notice of intended sale shall include all of the following:

(a) The date, time, and place of the intended sale, including the electronic address if the intended sale is by public auction via the Internet or other electronic media.

(b) The locations of computer workstations that are available to the public and instructions on accessing the public auction and submitting bids if the intended sale is conducted via the Internet or other electronic media.

(c) A description of the property to be sold.

(d) The name of the last assessee of the property.

(e) The minimum acceptable bid of the property to be sold.

(f) A statement that if the property is not redeemed before the close of business on the last business day prior to the date of the sale, the right of redemption will cease.

(g) A statement that if the property is sold, parties of interest, as defined in Section 4675, have the right to file a claim with the county for any proceeds from the sale which are in excess of the liens and costs required to be paid from the proceeds.

(h) A statement that if excess proceeds result from the sale, notice will be given to parties of interest, pursuant to law.

(i) A statement that if the parcel remains unsold after the tax sale, the date, time, and location of any subsequent sale.

(j) If applicable, that a deposit is required as a condition to submit bids on the property.

(k) If applicable, a statement that, for any property purchased by a credit transaction, the right of redemption will revive if full payment is not received by the tax collector prior to the close of business on the date, as specified by the tax collector under Section 3693.1, that full payment is due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 194, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3704.5.

In addition to the published notice required by Section 3702, the tax collector may advertise the intended sale by any means authorized by the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

3704.7.

(a) In the case of a property that is the primary residence of the last known assessee, as indicated by either a valid homeowner’s exemption on file with the county assessor in the name of the last known assessee, or the fact that the mailing address for the last tax bill is the same address as the property, the tax collector or his or her agent shall, in addition to any other notice required by this chapter, make a reasonable effort to contact in person, not more than 120 days or less than 10 days prior to the date of the sale, the owner-occupant of that property. In the course of the personal contact, the tax collector, or his or her agent, shall inform the owner-occupant of the following:

(1) That the property, if not redeemed, shall be offered for sale at a
 public auction.

(2) His or her redemption rights pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 4101).

(b) If the personal contact described in subdivision (a) is not made after reasonable efforts, the tax collector or his or her agent shall attempt to serve written notice, no less than five days prior to the date of the sale, with respect to the fact of the sale and the requirement that the tax collector be contacted immediately with respect to redemption of the property.

(c) The amount of the actual and reasonable costs incurred by the tax collector, or his or her agent, or both, in complying with the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b), as established pursuant to the requirements of Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 54985) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, shall be added to the
 required amount for redemption of the property.

(d) No transfer of title shall be invalidated by reason of failure to comply with the requirements of this section.

(e) If the property subject to the notice required by this section is the subject of a bankruptcy proceeding, the notice shall constitute a “notice of tax deficiency” pursuant to Section 362(b)(9)(B) of Title 11 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 119, Sec. 5.   (SB 1506)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3705.

Any city or the State or any taxing agency or revenue district may bid on property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 669.)
-------------------------------------------

3706.

If the property is not redeemed before the close of business on the last business day prior to the date of the sale of the property, the tax collector shall sell the property at public auction to the highest bidder at the time and place fixed.

 In the case of a sale at public auction, no bid shall be accepted for a sum less than the minimum price approved in the resolution of the board of supervisors; provided, however, the tax collector may reduce the minimum price under any of the following circumstances:

(a) If a partial redemption has been made under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4131) of Part 7 of Division 1.

(b) If a partial cancellation has been made under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4985) of Part 9 of Division 1 after that price was fixed, by not more than the ratio that the delinquency on the portion so redeemed or canceled bears to the delinquency upon the whole.

(c) If the total amount necessary to redeem is decreased due to the removal or reduction of default taxes resulting from the removal or reduction of a special assessment or a direct charge against the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 462, Sec. 2.   (SB 863)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

3706.1.

The tax collector may postpone the tax sale or any portion thereof under the following conditions:

(a) Notice of any postponement of a public auction tax sale shall be made by the tax collector who, by public declaration at the time and place originally fixed for the public auction, may postpone the sale to a new time, date, and place. No other notice of the postponed public auction need be given if the date for the new time, date, and place is within seven days of the time originally fixed for the sale.

(b) Notice of any postponed sealed-bid sale or postponed public auction sale that is scheduled to be held not less than eight days nor more than 90 days from the time originally fixed for the sale shall be made pursuant to the same provisions followed in providing notice of the original sale to parties of interest, as defined in Section 4675.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 264, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

3707.

(a) (1) The right of redemption terminates at the close of business on the last business day prior to the commencement date of the tax sale.

(2) The commencement of the tax sale constitutes the actual sale date regardless of auction conclusion.

(3) The taxpayer loses all rights during the auction period for failure to redeem the property by the final redemption date. 

(4) If the tax collector approves a sale as a credit transaction and does not receive full payment on or before the date upon which the tax collector requires pursuant to Section 3693.1, the right of redemption is revived on the next business day following that date.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any remittance sent by mail for redemption of tax-defaulted property must be received in the tax collector’s office prior to the time established in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(c) The sale shall be deemed complete when full payment has been received by the tax collector.

(d) The right of redemption revives if the property is not sold.

(e) If the tax-defaulted property is not redeemed prior to the redemption termination deadline specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), any person or entity with title of record to the property shall lose all rights in the property, including all legal and equitable interest therein. If the right of redemption is revived pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) or pursuant to subdivision (d), any person or entity with title of record to the property shall regain all rights in the property, including all legal and equitable interest therein.

(f) Nothing in this section affects the distribution of proceeds pursuant to Chapter 1.3 (commencing with Section 4671) of Part 8.

(g) This section shall apply regardless of whether the tax collector or his or her designee conducts the tax sale in person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 284, Sec. 1.   (AB 2746)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3708.

On receiving the full purchase price at any sale under this chapter, the tax collector shall, without charge, execute a deed to the purchaser.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 497, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

3708.1.

Upon execution the tax collector shall immediately record the deed with the county recorder and pay the recording fees. Recording of the deed shall constitute delivery thereof to the grantee named in the deed.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3708.5 by Stats. 1994, Ch. 705, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3708.5.

If a deed to the purchaser contains a clerical error or misstatement of fact, a corrected deed may be issued by the tax collector and recorded with the county recorder without charge. The new deed shall contain a statement of reasons for its issuance and, as far as practical, shall be the same as the original except where corrected.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3708.1 by Stats. 1994, Ch. 705, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3709.

The county clerk shall take acknowledgment of the deed without charge.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

3710.

In addition to the usual provisions of a deed conveying real property, the deed shall specify all of the following:

(a) That the legally levied taxes on the subject property were duly declared to be in default and were a lien on the property.

(b) That the tax collector, pursuant to a statutory power of sale, has sold the property.

(c) If a taxing agency objected to the sale, the fact of the objection and the name of the objecting taxing agency.

(d) The name of the purchaser, the date the property was sold, and the amount for which the property was sold.

(e) That the property is therefore conveyed to the purchaser according to law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 194, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

3711.

Except as against actual fraud, the deed duly acknowledged or proved is conclusive evidence of the regularity of all proceedings from the assessment of the assessor to the execution of the deed, both inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 529.)
-------------------------------------------

3712.

The deed conveys title to the purchaser free of all encumbrances of any kind existing before the sale, except:

(a) Any lien for installments of taxes and special assessments, that installments will become payable upon the secured roll after the time of the sale.

(b) The lien for taxes or assessments or other rights of any taxing agency that does not consent to the sale under this chapter.

(c) Liens for special assessments levied upon the property conveyed that were, at the time of the sale under this chapter, not included in the amount necessary to redeem the tax-defaulted
 property, and, where a taxing agency that collects its own taxes has consented to the sale under this chapter, not included in the amount required to redeem from sale to the taxing agency.

(d) Easements of any kind, including prescriptive, constituting servitudes upon or burdens to the property; water rights, the record title to which is held separately from the title to the property; and restrictions of record.

(e) Unaccepted, recorded, irrevocable offers of dedication of the property to the public or a public entity for a public purpose, and recorded options of any taxing agency to purchase the property or any interest therein for a public purpose.

(f) Unpaid assessments under the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code) that are not satisfied as a
 result of the sale proceeds being applied pursuant to Chapter 1.3 (commencing with Section 4671) of Part 8, or that are being collected through a foreclosure action pursuant to Part 14 (commencing with Section 8830) of Division 10 of the Streets and Highways Code. A sale pursuant to this chapter shall not nullify, eliminate, or reduce the amount of a foreclosure judgment pursuant to Part 14 (commencing with Section 8830) of Division 10 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(g) Any federal Internal Revenue Service liens that, pursuant to provisions of federal law, are not discharged by the sale, even though the tax collector has provided proper notice to the Internal Revenue Service before that date.

(h) Unpaid special taxes under the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982 (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code) that
 are not satisfied as a result of the sale proceeds being applied pursuant to Chapter 1.3 (commencing with Section 4671) of Part 8, or that are being collected through a foreclosure action pursuant to Section 53356.1 of the Government Code. A sale pursuant to this chapter shall not nullify, eliminate, or reduce the amount of a foreclosure judgment pursuant to Section 53356.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 288, Sec. 1.   (AB 261)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3713.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state and the intent of the provisions of this code, that the final tax deed or deeds of all taxing agencies, including counties, cities and counties, cities, irrigation districts, reclamation districts, and other taxing agencies that annually levy, assess, and collect, or cause to be collected, taxes or assessments upon real property within the state, should be, and are hereby declared to be, upon a parity with each other, and that regardless of when the levy of those taxes or assessments is or has been made, and regardless of when the final tax deed or assessment deed is or has been taken by the taxing agency, that the rights of all taxing agencies and all those deeds shall be equal and upon a parity with each other.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3517 by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

3716.

Within 30 days after the sale, the tax collector shall report to the assessor the following:

(a) The name of the purchaser.

(b) The date the property was sold.

(c) The amount for which the property was sold.

(d) The description of the property conveyed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 607, Sec. 7.   (SB 825)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3718.

The tax collector shall deposit the money received from the sale like tax collections and shall immediately transmit a report of sale to the county treasurer and a duplicate of the report to the county auditor. The report shall show:

(a) The cost of advertising the sale, including but not limited to the published notice required by Section 3702.

(b) The sums received for individual parcels.

(c) Identification of the parcels by year, page and number of the delinquent and current roll.

(d) The cost of recording the deeds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

3719.

The amount of the cost of advertising the sale, including but not limited to the published notice required by Section 3702, shall be deposited in the county general fund and the balance, excepting the recorder’s fee, shall be deposited in the delinquent tax sale trust fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1053.)
-------------------------------------------

3720.

On receipt of the duplicate report of sale, the auditor shall mail a copy of it to the secretary or clerk of the governing board of each taxing agency, not also a revenue district, and other than the State and the county, entitled to levy taxes or assessments on the property sold. He shall also enclose a notice for claims, specifying:

(a) A description of the property.

(b) That claims on the amount received from the sale shall be made within 60 days after the mailing of the notice for claims.

Such duplicate copies of report of sale shall be mailed for only those properties on which the taxing agency has consented to sale and thus is entitled to its proper share of the proceeds deposited in the delinquent tax sale trust fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 484.)
-------------------------------------------

3721.

On receipt of the notice for claims, the governing board of each taxing agency, not also a revenue district, having taxes or assessments levied on the property for the fiscal year preceding that in which the property was sold, shall forward a share claim to the county auditor, stating, in detail, the amounts due on the property still unpaid to the taxing agency, claiming their share of the proceeds from the sale as is determined by the distribution made under this division. The claim shall set out all the municipal and special district tax rates applicable to the deeded property for the fiscal year preceding that in which the property was sold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

3722.

As soon as practicable after the expiration of the time for filing claims, the county auditor shall present all share claims received by him to the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 529.)
-------------------------------------------

3723.

If the board of supervisors dispute the correctness of any share claim, the money received from the sale of the parcel involved in the disputed claim shall remain in the delinquent tax sale trust fund until the settlement of the claim by agreement of the governing boards or officers of the taxing agencies having delinquent taxes or assessments on the parcel or by judgment of a court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1939, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

3724.

If the share claims are correct or if settlement is made of all disputed claims relating to any parcel, the board of supervisors shall order the money in the delinquent tax sale trust fund received from the sale of the parcel to be distributed under this division among the taxing agencies having filed share claims. There shall also be distributed to the State of California its share of the money received from the sale of the parcel. The auditor shall draw and mail warrants on the delinquent tax sale trust fund in accordance with the order, and the State’s share shall be included in the next semiannual settlement between the county and the State.

Where the county assesses and collects taxes for a taxing agency which is also a revenue district, such taxing agency shall receive its share of the proceeds from any sale as distributed under Chapter 1.3, Part 8, Division 1, of this code, without the necessity of their receiving a copy of the report of sale or of submitting a share claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 484.)
-------------------------------------------

3725.

(a) A proceeding based on alleged invalidity or irregularity of any proceedings instituted under this chapter can only be commenced in a court if both of the following are satisfied:

(1) The person commencing the proceeding has first petitioned the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 3731 within one year of the date of the execution of the tax collector’s deed.

(2) The proceeding is commenced within one year of the date the board of supervisors determines that a tax deed sold under this part should not be rescinded pursuant to Section 3731.

(b) Sections 351 to 358, inclusive, of the Code of Civil Procedure do not apply to the time
 within which a proceeding may be brought under this section.

(c) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 288 of the Statutes of 2011 shall apply to sales that are completed on or after January 1, 2012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 167.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

3726.

A defense based on the alleged invalidity or irregularity of any proceeding instituted under this chapter can be maintained only in a proceeding commenced within one year after the date of execution of the tax collector’s deed or within one year of the date the board of supervisors determines that a tax deed sold under this part should not be rescinded pursuant to Section 3731, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 454, Sec. 9.   (SB 803)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

3727.

Whenever property has been purchased at tax sale, the purchaser or any other person claiming through the purchaser may bring suit to quiet title to all or any portion of the property and prosecute it to final judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

3728.

Before holding any tax deed heretofore or hereafter given under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 3771), former Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3475), former Chapter 4.3 (commencing with Section 3534), or former Sections 3897 and 3897d of the Political Code to be void, the court shall determine the correct amount of taxes, penalties and costs that should be paid upon redemption to discharge the tax and assessment liens of all taxing agencies and revenue districts had the purported tax sale not been held and the court shall order the former owner or other party in interest to pay that amount within six months as follows:

(a) To the purchaser, or his or her grantee or successor in interest, the amount of taxes, penalties and costs expended by him or her as determined by the court in pursuit of title to the property, and when the purchaser at that sale or the grantee in any deed for taxes or his or her grantee or successor in interest is in possession of that property in good faith and claiming the property under a tax deed, which is regular upon its face, and has made permanent improvements thereon, the court shall not make that decree until there has also been repaid to the purchaser or his or her grantee or successor in interest a sum, as determined by the court, equal to the amount by which the value of the property has been enhanced by those permanent improvements; and

(b) To the county tax collector, the balance, if any, of the correct amount as determined by the court that should be paid upon redemption, which shall be distributed by the county to the taxing agencies and revenue districts as redemption money.

If the amounts are not paid in accordance with the order the court shall not hold the tax deed void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 316, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

3728.1.

If the amount required to be paid in accordance with Section 3728 of this code is not paid within such six months, the court shall order a new tax deed issued by the county tax collector to the original grantee or his successor in interest as designated in the order. The tax collector shall thereupon execute and deliver a new tax deed which in addition to the usual provisions of a deed conveying real property shall specify:

(a) The oldest year in which a tax lien attached which has not been discharged.

(b) That the court ordered the payment of the correct amount of taxes, penalties and costs, stating the title of the court, the number of the case, the date of the order and the total amount of such taxes, penalties and costs so ordered paid.

(c) That such payment has not been made as ordered by the court.

(d) If the original assessment description was erroneous, the correct description as determined by the court.

Upon proof of the execution and delivery of such tax deed the court shall quiet the title of the grantee and his successors in interest and after such judgment becomes final the tax deed shall be conclusively presumed valid against the claims of any parties to the lawsuit and their successors in interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 516.)
-------------------------------------------

3729.

(a) When a court holds a tax deed given under this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 3771), former Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3475), former Chapter 4.3 (commencing with Section 3534), or former Sections 3897 and 3897d of the Political Code void, the purchaser at tax sale is entitled to a refund from the county of the amount paid as the purchase price in excess of the amount for which he or she has been reimbursed for taxes, penalties, and costs. The refund shall be made in the same manner as a refund of an overpayment of tax, except that the claim shall be presented within one year after the judgment becomes final.

(b) The holder of a tax certificate who received all or any part of the amount paid by the delinquent taxpayer shall not be obligated to make any refund or repayment of any amount to either the purchaser, the county, or any other person. The tax collector may use amounts on deposit in the Tax Certificate Redemption Fund to make the refund, but only to the extent those amounts were paid to the holder of the applicable tax certificate.
